Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-7] Accounts not guaranteed by the
State. (a) Nothing in this chapter shall create or be construed to
create any obligation of the director, the State, or any agency or
instrumentality of the State to guarantee for the benefit of any account owner
or designated beneficiary with respect to the:

(1) Return of principal;

(2) Rate of interest or other return on any account;
or

(3) Payment of interest or other return on any
account.

(b) The director shall adopt rules to provide
that every contract, application, or other similar document that may be used in
connection with opening an account clearly indicates that the account is not
insured by the State and that the principal deposited and the investment return
are not guaranteed by the State. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next